Connecticut, session 2026, HB05423.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) Not later than July 1, 2026, the
2 executive director of the Court Support Services Division of the Judicial
3 Branch shall report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a
4 of the general statutes, to the joint standing committees of the General
5 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to the judiciary and
6 appropriations and the budgets of state agencies on the usage of court
7 support services for the previous fiscal year and recommendations for
8 expansion of such services.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
APP Joint Favorable
HB5423 / File No. 630 1

HB5423 File No. 630
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires the executive director of the Court Support Services
Division (CSSD) of the Judicial Branch to report on the expansion of
community support services, resulting in no fiscal impact because CSSD
has the expertise and resources to complete the report.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5423 / File No. 630 2

HB5423 File No. 630
OFA Bill Analysis
HB 5423
AN ACT CONCERNING JUVENILE JUSTICE INITIATIVES.